Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,112
Rules of the road; exceptions.

Unless specifically made applicable, the Nebraska Rules of the Road, except those provisions relating to careless driving, reckless driving, and driving while under the influence of alcoholic liquor or drugs, shall not apply to:

(1) Persons, teams of draft animals, motor vehicles, and other equipment while actually engaged in work upon the surface of a highway, but the rules shall apply to such persons and vehicles when traveling to or from such work; or

(2) Government employees and public utility employees to the extent that there would be a conflict between the rules and the performance of their official duties.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 896, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 133, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-606;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 208.

This section does not absolve persons engaged in road work from obeying the fundamental premise that an operator of a vehicle is under a continuing duty to exercise reasonable care for the safety of others. Gatzemeyer v. Neligh Township, 233 Neb. 329, 445 N.W.2d 593 (1989).

Under the facts of this case, a wrongful death action was allowed against the driver and operator of a snowplow when the plow was in operation on the left side of the road in the face of oncoming traffic. Beebe v. Sorensen Sand & Gravel Co., 209 Neb. 559, 308 N.W.2d 829 (1981).